Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-1505.05
Clean Air Title V Cash Fund; created; use; investment.

The Clean Air Title V Cash Fund is created. The department shall remit all fees collected pursuant to section 81-1505.04 to the State Treasurer for credit to the fund. Any fee collected pursuant to section 81-1505.04 shall be used solely to pay the reasonable direct and indirect costs required to develop and administer the air quality permit program, including expenses of the Small Business Compliance Advisory Panel. Any money in the Clean Air Title V Cash Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Beginning July 1, 2026, any investment earnings from investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund. Transfers of any previously accumulated investment earnings may be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.

Laws 1995, LB 429, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1072, § 201.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.